Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3899.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 1.148, is amended to read: 1.148 STATE GRAIN. Subdivision 1. Wild rice. Zizania aquaticanew text begin or zizania palustrisnew text end , commonly known as wild ricenew text begin , psíŋ,new text end or deleted text begin manomindeleted text end new text begin manoominnew text end , is the official state grain of the state of Minnesota.new text begin It is the policy of this state to recognize the inherent right of uncultivated wild rice to exist and thrive in Minnesota.new text end Subd. 2. Photograph. A photograph of zizania aquaticanew text begin or zizania palustrisnew text end , commonly known as wild ricenew text begin , psíŋ,new text end or deleted text begin manomindeleted text end new text begin manoominnew text end , may be displayed in the Office of the Secretary of State.